North Dakota, session 69, HB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-05.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
20.1-05.1-02. Discretionary special allocation hunting license authorization.
1. Subject to the restrictions under this section and in addition to the special allocation licenses
authorized under section 20.1-05.1-01, if determined appropriate by the director based on the
sustainability of the species population, the director may issue to eligible organizations the
following annual special allocation hunting licenses:
a. Not more than two elk licenses, but the total issued under this subdivision may not
exceed two percent of the general lottery allocation of elk licenses for the season.
b. Not more than two moose licenses, but the total issued under this subdivision may not
exceed two percent of the general lottery allocation of moose licenses for the season.
c. Not more than two antelope licenses, but the total issued under this subdivision may not
exceed two percent of the general lottery allocation of antelope licenses for the previous
season.
d. Not more than ten white-tailed deer licenses.
2. An eligible organization may apply annually to be considered for issuance of up to two special
allocation hunting licenses under this section. Applications under this subsection must be filed
at the times, in the manner, and containing the information required by rules adopted by the
director. If more applications are filed than the number of licenses under this section available
for that species for a season, the director shall determine by lottery which organizations will
receive the available licenses.
3. An eligible organization that obtains a license under this section and conducts a raffle or
auction to determine the recipient of the license must conduct the raffle or auction in
compliance with rules adopted by the director. An eligible organization that obtains a license
under this section shall submit reports concerning a raffle or auction as the director requires.
An individual may apply to receive an elk or moose license through a raffle or auction under
this section as well as through the game and fish department general lottery. If an individual
receives an elk or moose license under this section, the individual is not eligible to receive an
elk or moose license through the game and fish department general lottery that year and may
not obtain an elk or moose license under section 20.1-05.1-01 that year. If an individual
receives an elk or moose license under section 20.1-05.1-01, the individual is not eligible to
receive an elk or moose license under this section that year.
4. An individual who has been convicted of illegally taking a moose, elk, or bighorn sheep is not
eligible to apply for or receive a license under this section.
5. For purposes of this section, "eligible organization" means an organization that:

H. B. NO. 1094 - PAGE 2
a. Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of the
Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3); 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(19)] and provides with its
application a copy of the letter from the internal revenue service to that effect.;
b. Is on file as a nonprofit corporation in good standing in the office of the secretary of
state.;
c. Agrees in its application to contribute at least tentwenty percent of the net proceeds of
any raffle of a license under this section to a conservation-related project to be conducted
in this state and approved by the director.; and
d. Is not the recipient of a special allocation hunting license under section 20.1-05.1-01.

H. B. NO. 1094 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1094.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 4 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 1 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State